Nebraska, session 109, LB1078.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1078 LB1078
2026 2026
Section 1. Sections 1 to 5 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Fair Online Pricing Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Fair Online Pricing Act:
(1) Coupon means any method by which a consumer receives a discount
on the purchase of any item that is funded, produced, sponsored,
promoted, or furnished, either directly or indirectly, by a business,
including any paper coupon, digital coupon, or instant redeemable coupon;
(2) Discount means any reduction from the regular or advertised
price offered to consumers on a temporary or conditional basis;
(3) Hardware state means a condition or mode of existence of a
system, component, or simulation, including the battery life of, number
of wireless connections detected by, hardware performance characteristics
of, and age of the device, and data that is erased or retained when an
online device is restarted or powered down; and
(4) Online device means a physical object that has built-in
resources that allow it to communicate through the Internet or a short-
range wireless technology and react to interface conditions, including
any laptop computer, desktop computer, tablet, smartphone, or other smart
hardware.
Sec. 3. (1) A price offered to a consumer through the consumer's
online device shall not be generated in whole, or in part, based on any
of the following input data:
(a) The hardware or hardware state of the online device. This
subdivision (a) does not prohibit the generation of a price offered to a
consumer based on the hardware or hardware state of the online device for
the following purposes:
(i) Any repair or maintenance of the online device; or
(ii) Calculating a trade-in value of the online device;
(b) The presence or absence of any software on the online device; or
(c) Geolocation data of the online device, when used to set a price
based on inferences about the consumer made from such data. This
-2-

LB1078 LB1078
2026 2026
subdivision (c) does not prohibit the use of geolocation data of the
online device and the consumer's location to generate a price for any
reason that is not specified in this subdivision (c), including:
(i) To determine pricing based on the real-time demand for the
product or service in the consumer's vicinity, if the product or service
is provided immediately upon request; or
(ii) To provide accurate pricing information based on price
variances at different physical locations, due to legitimate cost
differentials associated with providing a good or service to different
consumers or state or local government taxes, duties, or other fees
imposed by any state or local government on the transaction.
(2) The Fair Online Pricing Act does not prohibit any coupon;
discount; or other bona fide rebate, sale, or promotion that:
(a) Is separate from the price of any good or service;
(b) Reduces the price of any good or service;
(c) Is issued or offered to the general public on the same terms;
and
(d) Does not incorporate input data as specified in subsection (1)
of this section.
Sec. 4. (1) A person who violates the Fair Online Pricing Act is
liable for a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed ten thousand
dollars for each violation.
(2) The Attorney General may bring an action in the name of the
State of Nebraska to:
(a) Recover a civil penalty under this section;
(b) Restrain or enjoin the person from violating the Fair Online
Pricing Act; or
(c) Recover the civil penalty and seek injunctive relief.
(3) The Attorney General may recover reasonable attorney's fees and
other reasonable expenses incurred in investigating and bringing an
action under this section.
-3-

LB1078 LB1078
2026 2026
(4) All money collected under this section shall be remitted to the
State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article VII, section
5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.
Sec. 5. The duties and obligations imposed by the Fair Online
Pricing Act are cumulative with any other duties or obligations imposed
under other law and shall not be construed to relieve any party from any
duty or obligation that is imposed under other law, including any duty or
obligation that is related to the accurate advertising, displaying, or
offering of prices.
-4-